Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2654
Department order; appeal.

Any person aggrieved by any order of the department may appeal such order to the district court. Such appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1993, LB 588, § 33.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.